Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 2. Standard Nonforfeiture Law

§ 26-16-201.
Short title; policy issue date; valuation manual operative date.

This article is known as the Standard Nonforfeiture Law for Life Insurance.

For the purpose of this article the date of issue of a policy is the date on which the insured’s rated age is determined.

For the purpose of this article, “operative date of the valuation manual” means January 1, 2017.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136,§ 364; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-364; Laws 1975, ch. 99,§§ 1, 2; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-127; Laws 1981, ch. 121,§ 2; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2017 ch. 67, § 2, effective March 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

added (c).

Laws 2017, ch. 67, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2017.

§ 26-16-202.
Policy provisions.

No life insurance policy, except as stated in W.S.

26-16-212

, shall be delivered or issued for delivery in this state unless it contains provisions conforming in substance to each of the following provisions, or corresponding provisions which the commissioner determines are at least as favorable to the defaulting or surrendering policyholder as are the minimum requirements specified in this subsection and are essentially in compliance with W.S.

26-16-210

:

In case of default in any premium payment the insurer will grant, upon proper request not later than sixty (60) days after the due date of the premium in default, a paid-up nonforfeiture benefit on a plan stipulated in the policy, effective as of the due date, in an amount as is specified in this article. Instead of the stipulated paid-up nonforfeiture benefit, the insurer, upon proper request not later than sixty (60) days after the due date of the premium in default, may substitute an actuarially equivalent alternative paid-up nonforfeiture benefit which provides a greater amount or longer period of death benefits or, if applicable, a greater amount or earlier payment of endowment benefits;

Upon surrender of the policy within sixty (60) days after the due date of any premium payment in default after premiums have been paid for at least three (3) full years in the case of ordinary insurance or five (5) full years in the case of industrial insurance, the insurer will pay, instead of any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit, a cash surrender value in an amount as is specified in this article;

A specified paid-up nonforfeiture benefit is effective as specified in the policy unless the person entitled to make the election elects another available option not later than sixty (60) days after the due date of the premium in default;

If the policy is paid-up by completion of all premium payments or if it is continued under any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit which became effective on or after the third policy anniversary in the case of ordinary insurance or the fifth policy anniversary in the case of industrial insurance, the insurer, upon surrender of the policy within thirty (30) days after any policy anniversary, will pay a cash surrender value in an amount as is specified in this article;

In the case of policies which cause on a basis guaranteed in the policy unscheduled changes in benefits or premiums, or which provide an option for changes in benefits or premiums other than a change to a new policy, a statement of the mortality table, interest rate and method of use in calculating cash surrender values and the paid-up nonforfeiture benefits under the policy. All other policies shall contain a statement of the mortality table and interest rate used in calculating the cash surrender values and the paid-up nonforfeiture benefits available under the policy, together with a table showing the cash surrender value, if any, and paid-up nonforfeiture benefit, if any, available under the policy on each policy anniversary either during the first twenty (20) policy years or during the term of the policy, whichever is shorter, those values and benefits to be calculated upon the assumption that there are no dividends or paid-up additions credited to the policy and that there is no indebtedness to the insurer on the policy;

A statement:

That the cash surrender values and the paid-up nonforfeiture benefits available under the policy are not less than the minimum values and benefits required by or pursuant to the insurance law of the state in which the policy is delivered;

Explaining the manner in which the cash surrender values and the paid-up nonforfeiture benefits are altered by the existence of any paid-up additions credited to the policy or any indebtedness to the insurer on the policy;

That the method of computation has been filed with the insurance supervisory official of the state in which the policy is delivered, if a detailed statement of the method of computation of the values and benefits shown in the policy is not stated in the policy; and

Of the method to be used in calculating the cash surrender value and paid-up nonforfeiture benefit available under the policy on any policy anniversary beyond the last anniversary for which the values and benefits are consecutively shown in the policy.

Any provision or part thereof set forth in paragraphs (a)(i) through (vi) of this section, not applicable by reason of the insurance plan, to the extent inapplicable, may be omitted from the policy.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 364; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-364; Laws 1975, ch. 99, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-127; Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 2; 1983, ch. 31, § 1; ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-203.
Cash surrender values.

The insurer may reserve the right to defer the payment of any cash surrender value for a period of six (6) months after demand therefor with surrender of the policy.

Cash surrender value shall be as follows:

Any cash surrender value available under the policy in case of default in a premium payment due on any policy anniversary, whether or not required by W.S.

26-16-202

, shall be an amount not less than the excess, if any, of the present value, on the anniversary of the future guaranteed benefits, including any existing paid-up additions, which would have been provided for by the policy if there had been no default, over the sum of:

The then present value of the adjusted premiums as defined in W.S.

26-16-205

through

26-16-209

corresponding to premiums which would have fallen due on and after the anniversary; and

The amount of any indebtedness to the insurer on the policy.

For any policy issued on or after the operative date of W.S.

26-16-209

, which provides supplemental life insurance or annuity benefits at the insured’s option and for an identifiable additional premium by rider or supplemental policy provision, the cash surrender value referred to in paragraph (i) of this subsection shall be an amount not less than the sum of the cash surrender value as defined in that paragraph for an otherwise similar policy issued at the same age without the rider or supplemental policy provision and the cash surrender value as defined in that paragraph for a policy which provides only the benefits otherwise provided by the rider or supplemental policy provision;

For any family policy issued on or after the operative date of W.S. 26-16-209, which defines a primary insured and provides term insurance on the life of the spouse of the primary insured expiring before the spouse’s age seventy-one (71), the cash surrender value referred to in paragraph (i) of this subsection shall be an amount not less than the sum of the cash surrender value as defined in that paragraph for an otherwise similar policy issued at the same age without the term insurance on the life of the spouse and the cash surrender value as defined in the paragraph for a policy which provides only the benefits otherwise provided by the term insurance on the life of the spouse;

Any cash surrender value available within thirty (30) days after any policy anniversary under any policy paid-up by completion of all premium payments or any policy continued under any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit, whether or not required by W.S.

26-16-202

(a), shall be an amount not less than the present value, on the anniversary, of the future guaranteed benefits provided for by the policy, including any existing paid-up additions, decreased by any indebtedness to the insurer on the policy.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 364; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-364; Laws 1975, ch. 99, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-127; Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 2; 1983, ch. 31, § 1; ch. 190, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of insurance agent or broker to insured for misrepresentation of cash surrender value or accumulated value benefits of life insurance policy, 44 ALR4th 1030.

§ 26-16-204.
Paid-up nonforfeiture benefits.

Any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit available under the policy in case of default in a premium payment due on any policy anniversary shall be such that its present value as of the anniversary shall be at least equal to the cash surrender value then provided by the policy or, if none is provided, that cash surrender value which would have been required by this article in the absence of the condition that premiums be paid for at least a specified period.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 364; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-364; Laws 1975, ch. 99, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-127; Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 2; 1983, ch. 31, § 1; ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-205.
Section applicability; adjusted premiums.

This section does not apply to policies issued on or after the operative date of W.S.

26-16-209

.

Except as provided in W.S.

26-16-207

, the adjusted premiums for any policy shall be calculated on an annual basis and shall be such uniform percentage of the premiums specified in the policy for each policy year, excluding any extra premiums charged because of impairment or special hazards, that the present value, at the date of issue of the policy, of all the adjusted premiums shall be equal to the sum of:

The then present value of the future guaranteed benefits provided by the policy;

Two percent (2%) of the amount of insurance, if the insurance is uniform in amount, or of the equivalent uniform amount, as otherwise defined in this article, if the amount of insurance varies with duration of the policy;

Forty percent (40%) of the adjusted premium for the first policy year;

Twenty-five percent (25%) of either the adjusted premium for the first policy year or the adjusted premium for a whole life policy of the same uniform or equivalent uniform amount with uniform premiums for the whole of life issued at the same age for the same amount of insurance, whichever is less, except that in applying the percentages specified in paragraph (iii) of this subsection and this paragraph, no adjusted premium is deemed to exceed four percent (4%) of the amount of insurance or uniform amount equivalent thereto.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 364; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-364; Laws 1975, ch. 99, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-127; Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 2; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-206.
Varying amount of insurance based on policy duration; uniform equivalent.

In the case of a policy providing an amount of insurance varying with duration of the policy, the equivalent uniform amount thereof for the purpose of W.S.

26-16-205

is the uniform amount of insurance provided by an otherwise similar policy, containing the same endowment benefits, if any, issued at the same age and for the same term, the amount of which does not vary with duration and the benefits under which have the same present value at the date of issue as the benefits under the policy.

In the case of a policy providing a varying amount of insurance issued on the life of a child under age ten (10) the equivalent uniform amount may be computed as though the amount of insurance provided by the policy prior to the attainment of age ten (10) were the amount provided by the policy at age ten (10).

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 364; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-364; Laws 1975, ch. 99, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-127; Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 2; 1983, ch. 31, § 1; ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-207.
Adjustment of premiums for benefits provided by rider or supplemental policy provision.

The adjusted premiums for any policy providing term insurance benefits by rider or supplemental policy provision shall be equal to:

The adjusted premiums for an otherwise similar policy issued at the same age without the term insurance benefits, increased, during the period for which premiums for the term insurance benefits are payable, by;

The adjusted premiums for the term insurance. Paragraphs (a)(i) and (ii) of this section shall be calculated separately and as specified in W.S.

26-16-205

and

26-16-206

, except that for the purposes of W.S.

26-16-205

(b)(ii), (iii) and (iv), the amount of insurance or equivalent uniform amount of insurance used in the calculation of the adjusted premiums referred to in this paragraph shall be equal to the excess of the corresponding amount determined for the entire policy over the amount used in the calculation of the adjusted premiums in paragraph (a)(i) of this section.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 364; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-364; Laws 1975, ch. 99, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-127; Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 2; 1983, ch. 31, § 1; ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-16-208.
Section applicability; calculation of certain adjusted premiums.

This section does not apply to ordinary policies issued on or after the operative date of W.S.

26-16-209

. All adjusted premiums and present values referred to in this article, for all policies of ordinary insurance, shall be calculated on the basis of the commissioners’ 1958 standard ordinary mortality table, except that for any category of ordinary insurance issued on female risks, adjusted premiums and present values may be calculated according to an age not more than six (6) years younger than the insured’s actual age.

Calculations for all policies of industrial insurance shall be made on the basis of the commissioners’ 1961 standard industrial mortality table.

All calculations shall be made on the basis of the rate of interest specified in the policy for calculating cash surrender values and paid-up nonforfeiture benefits. The rate of interest shall not exceed three and one-half percent (31/2%) per annum, except that a rate of interest not exceeding four percent (4%) per annum may be used for policies issued on or after July 1, 1975 and prior to May 20, 1981 and a rate of interest not exceeding five and one-half percent (51/2%) per annum may be used for policies issued on or after May 20, 1981.

In calculating the present value of any paid-up term insurance with accompanying pure endowment, if any, offered as a nonforfeiture benefit, the rates of mortality assumed may be not more than those shown in the commissioners’ 1958 extended term insurance table in the case of ordinary insurance, and the commissioners’ 1961 industrial extended term insurance table in the case of industrial policies.

For insurance issued on a substandard basis, the calculation of any adjusted premiums and present values may be based on any mortality table the insurer specifies and the commissioner approves.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 364; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-364; Laws 1975, ch. 99, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-127; Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 2; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-209.
Section applicability; premium adjustment for any policy; annual calculation; exception.

This section applies to policies issued on or after the operative date in subsection (n) of this section.

Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section, the adjusted premiums for any policy shall be calculated on an annual basis and shall be the uniform percentage of the premiums specified in the policy for each policy year, excluding:

Amounts payable as extra premiums to cover impairments or special hazards; and

Any uniform annual contract charge or policy fee specified in the policy in a statement of the method to be used in calculating the cash surrender values and paid-up nonforfeiture benefits, that the present value, at the date of issue of the policy, of all adjusted premiums shall be equal to the sum of:

The then present value of the future guaranteed benefits provided by the policy;

One percent (1%) of either the amount of insurance, if the insurance is uniform in amount, or the average amount of insurance at the beginning of each of the first ten (10) policy years; and

One hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the nonforfeiture net level premium as otherwise defined in this section. In applying this percentage, no nonforfeiture net level premium is deemed to exceed four percent (4%) of either the amount of insurance, if the insurance is uniform in amount, or the average amount of insurance at the beginning of each of the first ten (10) policy years.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 176, § 2.

The nonforfeiture net level premium shall be equal to the present value, at the date of issue of the policy, of the guaranteed benefits provided by the policy divided by the present value, at the date of issue of the policy, of an annuity of one (1) per annum payable on the date of issue of the policy and on each policy anniversary on which a premium falls due.

For policies which cause on a basis guaranteed in the policy unscheduled changes in benefits or premiums, or which provide an option for changes in benefits or premiums other than a change to a new policy, the adjusted premiums and present values shall initially be calculated on the assumption that future benefits and premiums do not change from those stipulated at the date of policy issue. At the time of any such change in the benefits or premiums the future adjusted premiums, nonforfeiture net level premiums and present values shall be recalculated on the assumption that future benefits and premiums do not change from those stipulated by the policy immediately after the change.

Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section the recalculated future adjusted premiums for any such policy shall be the uniform percentage of the future premiums specified in the policy for each policy year, excluding amounts payable as extra premiums to cover impairments and special hazards, and also excluding any uniform annual contract charge or policy fee specified in the policy in a statement of the method to be used in calculating the cash surrender values and paid-up nonforfeiture benefits, that the present value, at the time of change to the newly defined benefits or premiums, of all the future adjusted premiums shall be equal to the excess of: The sum of the then present value of the then future guaranteed benefits provided for by the policy and the additional expense allowance, if any, over the then cash surrender value, if any, or present value of any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit under the policy.

The additional expense allowance, at the time of the change to the newly defined benefits or premiums, shall be the sum of:

One percent (1%) of the excess, if positive, of the average amount of insurance at the beginning of each of the first ten (10) policy years after the change over the average amount of insurance prior to the change at the beginning of each of the first ten (10) policy years after the time of the most recent previous change, or, if there has been no previous change, the date of issue of the policy; and

One hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the increase, if positive, in the nonforfeiture net level premium.

The recalculated nonforfeiture net level premium shall be equal to the result obtained by dividing (i) by (ii) where:

Equals the sum of:

The nonforfeiture net level premium applicable prior to the change times the present value of an annuity of one (1) per annum payable on each anniversary of the policy on or after the date of the change on which a premium would have fallen due had the change not occurred; and

The present value of the increase in future guaranteed benefits provided for by the policy; and

Equals the present value of an annuity of one (1) per annum payable on each policy anniversary on or after the date of change on which a premium falls due.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section, for a policy issued on a substandard basis which provides reduced graded amounts of insurance so that, in each policy year, the policy has the same tabular mortality cost as an otherwise similar policy issued on the standard basis which provides higher uniform amounts of insurance, adjusted premiums and present values may be calculated as if the policy were issued to provide the higher uniform amounts of insurance on the standard basis.

All adjusted premiums and present values referred to in this article shall be calculated for all policies of ordinary insurance on the basis of the commissioners’ 1980 standard ordinary mortality table or, at the election of the company for any one (1) or more specified life insurance plans, the commissioners’ 1980 standard ordinary mortality table with ten-year select mortality factors; for all industrial insurance policies on the basis of the commissioners’ 1961 standard industrial mortality table; and for all policies issued in a particular calendar year on the basis of a rate of interest not exceeding the nonforfeiture interest rate as defined in this section for policies issued in that calendar year, except that:

At the insurer’s option, calculations for all policies issued in a particular calendar year may be made on the basis of a rate of interest not exceeding the nonforfeiture interest rate, as defined in this subsection, for policies issued in the immediately preceding calendar year;

Under any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit, including any paid-up dividend additions, any cash surrender value available, whether or not required by W.S. 26-16-202(a), shall be calculated on the basis of the mortality table and rate of interest used in determining the amount of the paid-up nonforfeiture benefit and paid-up dividend additions, if any;

A company may calculate the amount of any guaranteed paid-up nonforfeiture benefit including any paid-up additions under the policy on the basis of an interest rate not lower than that specified in the policy for calculating cash surrender values;

In calculating the present value of any paid-up term insurance with accompanying pure endowment, if any, offered as a nonforfeiture benefit, the rates of mortality assumed shall not be more than those shown in the commissioners’ 1980 extended term insurance table for policies of ordinary insurance and not more than the commissioners’ 1961 industrial extended term insurance table for policies of industrial insurance;

For insurance issued on a substandard basis, the calculation of the adjusted premiums and present values may be based on appropriate modifications of the tables specified in this subsection;

For policies issued prior to the operative date of the valuation manual, any commissioners’ standard ordinary mortality tables the NAIC adopts after 1980, that are approved by regulation the commissioner promulgates, for use in determining the minimum nonforfeiture standard, may be substituted for the commissioners’ 1980 standard ordinary mortality table with or without ten-year select mortality factors or for the commissioners’ 1980 extended term insurance table;

For policies issued on or after the operative date of the valuation manual, the valuation manual shall provide the commissioners’ standard mortality table for use in determining the minimum nonforfeiture standard that may be substituted for the commissioners’ 1980 standard ordinary mortality table with or without ten-year select mortality factors or for the commissioners’ 1980 extended term insurance table. If the commissioner approves by regulation any commissioners’ standard ordinary mortality table adopted by the NAIC for use in determining the minimum nonforfeiture standard for policies issued on or after the operative date of the valuation manual then that minimum nonforfeiture standard supersedes the minimum nonforfeiture standard provided by the valuation manual;

For policies issued prior to the operative date of the valuation manual, any commissioners’ standard industrial mortality tables the NAIC adopts after 1980, that are approved by regulation the commissioner promulgates, for use in determining the minimum nonforfeiture standard, may be substituted for the commissioners’ 1961 standard industrial mortality table or the commissioners’ 1961 industrial extended term insurance table;

For policies issued on or after the operative date of the valuation manual, the valuation manual shall provide the commissioners’ standard mortality table for use in determining the minimum nonforfeiture standard that may be substituted for the commissioners’ 1961 standard industrial mortality table or the commissioners’ 1961 industrial extended term insurance table. If the commissioner approves by regulation any commissioners’ standard industrial mortality table adopted by the NAIC for use in determining the minimum nonforfeiture standard for policies issued on or after the operative date of the valuation manual then that minimum nonforfeiture standard supersedes the minimum nonforfeiture standard provided by the valuation manual.

The nonforfeiture interest rate is defined as follows:

For policies issued prior to the operative date of the valuation manual, the nonforfeiture interest rate per annum for any policy issued in a particular calendar year is equal to one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the calendar year statutory valuation interest rate for such policy as defined in the standard valuation law rounded to the nearer one-fourth percent (1/4%), provided the nonforfeiture interest rate shall not be less than four percent (4%);

For policies issued on or after the operative date of the valuation manual, the nonforfeiture interest rate per annum for any policy issued in a particular calendar year shall be provided by the valuation manual.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this code [title 26] to the contrary, any refiling or nonforfeiture values or their methods of computation for any previously approved policy form which involves only a change in the interest rate or mortality table used to compute nonforfeiture values shall not require refiling of any other provisions of that policy form.

After the effective date of this section, any insurer may file with the commissioner a written notice of its election to comply with this section after a specified date before January 1, 1989, and the date specified is the operative date of this section for the insurer, except that if an insurer does not make the election, the operative date of this section for the insurer is January 1, 1989. Before that date the election may be made on a product-by-product basis.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 364; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-364; Laws 1975, ch. 99, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-127; Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 2; 1983, ch. 31, § 1; ch. 190, § 1; 1984, ch. 9, § 1; 1987, ch. 40, § 1; 1994, ch. 76, § 2; 2011, ch. 176, §§ 1, 2; 2017 ch. 67, § 2, effective March 1, 2017.

The 2011 amendment,

in (b)(ii)(C), added the second sentence; repealed former (b)(ii)(D), which read: “In applying the percentage specified in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph no nonforfeiture net level premium is deemed to exceed four percent (4%) of either the amount of insurance, if the insurance is uniform in amount, or the average amount of insurance at the beginning of each of the first ten (10) policy years”; and made related changes.

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

The 2017 amendment,

at the beginning of (j)(vi), substituted “For policies issued prior to the operative date of the valuation manual, any commisssioners’ standard” for “Any,” and made a stylistic change; added (j)(vii) and (j)(ix), and redesignated former (j)(vii) as (j)(viii); in the introductory language of (k), inserted “is defined as follows”; added (k)(ii) and the (k)(i) designation, and at the beginning of (k)(i), inserted “For policies issued prior to the operative date of the valuation mannual, the nonforfeiture interest rate,” added “provided the nonforfeiture interest rate shall not be less than four percent (4%)” and made a stylistic change.

Laws 2017, ch. 67, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2017.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

The phrase, “effective date of this section,” in subsection (n), first appeared in Laws 1983, ch. 190, which was effective on July 1, 1983.

§ 26-16-210.
Determination of specified life insurance plan premiums and benefits.

For any life insurance plan which provides for future premium determination, the amounts of which are to be determined by the insurer based on the then estimates of future experience, or for any life insurance plan which is of such a nature that minimum values cannot be determined by the methods described in W.S.

26-16-202

through

26-16-209

, the commissioner shall be satisfied that:

The benefits provided under the plan are substantially as favorable to policyholders and insureds as the minimum benefits otherwise required by W.S.

26-16-202

through

26-16-209

;

The benefits and the pattern of premiums of that plan are not such as to mislead prospective policyholders or insureds.

The cash surrender values and paid-up nonforfeiture benefits provided by the plan shall not be less than the minimum values and benefits required for the plan computed by a method consistent with the principles of this article for life insurance, as determined by regulations the commissioner promulgates.

This subsection, in addition to all other applicable subsections of this section, applies to all policies issued on or after January 1, 1986. Any cash surrender value available under the policy in the event of default in a premium payment due on any policy anniversary shall be in an amount which does not differ by more than two-tenths of one percent (.2%) of either the amount of insurance, if the insurance is uniform in amount, or the average amount of insurance at the beginning of each of the first ten (10) policy years, from the sum of (A) the greater of zero and the basic cash value as specified in this subsection and (B) the present value of any existing paid-up additions less the amount of any indebtedness to the insurer under the policy;
(c) (i) This subsection, in addition to all other applicable subsections of this section, applies to all policies issued on or after January 1, 1986. Any cash surrender value available under the policy in the event of default in a premium payment due on any policy anniversary shall be in an amount which does not differ by more than two-tenths of one percent (.2%) of either the amount of insurance, if the insurance is uniform in amount, or the average amount of insurance at the beginning of each of the first ten (10) policy years, from the sum of (A) the greater of zero and the basic cash value as specified in this subsection and (B) the present value of any existing paid-up additions less the amount of any indebtedness to the insurer under the policy;

Must be the same percentage for each policy year between the second policy anniversary and the later of (1) the fifth policy anniversary and (2) the first policy anniversary at which there is available under the policy a cash surrender value in an amount, before including any paid-up additions and before deducting any indebtedness, of at least two-tenths of one percent (.2%) of either the amount of insurance, if the insurance be uniform in amount, or the average amount of insurance at the beginning of each of the first ten (10) policy years; and

Must be such that no percentage after the later of the two (2) policy anniversaries specified in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph may apply to fewer than five (5) consecutive policy years.

(ii)

The basic cash value shall be equal to the present value, on such anniversary, of the future guaranteed benefits which would have been provided for by the policy, excluding any existing paid-up additions and before deduction of any indebtedness to the insurer, if there had been no default, less the then present value of the nonforfeiture factors, as specified in paragraph (iii) of this subsection, corresponding to premiums which would have fallen due on and after such anniversary. However, the effects on the basic cash value of supplemental life insurance or annuity benefits or of family coverage, as described in W.S.

26-16-203

or

26-16-207

, whichever is applicable, shall be the same as are the effects specified in W.S.

26-16-203

or

26-16-207

, whichever is applicable on the cash surrender values defined in that subsection;

(iii)

The nonforfeiture factor for each policy year shall be an amount equal to a percentage of the adjusted premium for the policy year, as defined in W.S.

26-16-205

,

26-16-206

and

26-16-207

or in W.S.

26-16-209

, whichever is applicable. Except as is required by subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, such percentage:

(iv)

No basic cash value may be less than the value which would be obtained if the adjusted premiums for the policy, as defined in W.S.

26-16-205

,

26-16-206

and

26-16-207

or in W.S.

26-16-209

, whichever is applicable, were substituted for the nonforfeiture factors in the calculation of the basic cash value;

(v)

All adjusted premiums and present values referred to in this subsection, for a particular policy, shall be calculated on the same mortality and interest bases as are used in demonstrating the policy’s compliance with the other subsections of this section. The cash surrender values referred to in this subsection shall include any endowment benefits provided for by the policy;

(vi)

Any cash surrender value available other than in the event of default in a premium payment due on a policy anniversary, and the amount of any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit available under the policy in the event of default in a premium payment shall be determined in manners consistent with the manners specified for determining the analogous minimum amounts in W.S.

26-16-202

,

26-16-203

,

26-16-204

,

26-16-209

, and

26-16-211

. The amounts of any cash surrender values and of any paid-up nonforfeiture benefits granted in connection with additional benefits such as those listed as paragraphs (i) through (vi) of this subsection shall conform with the principals of this section.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 364; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-364; Laws 1975, ch. 99, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-127; Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 2; 1983, ch. 31, § 1; ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-211.
Calculating cash surrender and paid-up nonforfeiture benefits for premium default other than on policy anniversary.

Any cash surrender value and any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit, available under the policy in case of default in a premium payment due at any time other than on the policy anniversary, shall be calculated with allowance for the lapse of time and the payment of fractional premiums beyond the last preceding policy anniversary. All values referred to in W.S. 26-16-203(b) through

26-16-209

may be calculated upon the assumption that any death benefit is payable at the end of the policy year of death. The net value of any paid-up additions, other than paid-up term additions, shall not be less than the amounts used to provide the additions. Notwithstanding W.S. 26-16-203(b), the following additional benefits payable shall be disregarded in ascertaining cash surrender values and nonforfeiture benefits required by this article and are not required to be included in any paid-up nonforfeiture benefits:

In case of death or dismemberment by accident or accidental means;

In case of total and permanent disability;

As reversionary annuity or deferred reversionary annuity benefits;

As term insurance benefits provided by a rider or supplemental policy provision to which, if issued as a separate policy, this section would not apply;

As term insurance on the life of a child provided in a policy on the life of a parent of the child, if the term insurance expires before the child’s age is twenty-six (26), is uniform in amount after the child’s age is one (1) and is not paid-up because of the death of a parent of the child; and

As other policy benefits additional to life insurance and endowment benefits, and premiums for all the additional benefits.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 364; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-364; Laws 1975, ch. 99, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-127; Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 2; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-16-212.
Applicability of article.

This article does not apply to any:

Reinsurance;

Group insurance;

Pure endowment;

Annuity or reversionary annuity contract;

Term policy of uniform amount which provides no guaranteed nonforfeiture or endowment benefits, or renewal thereof, of twenty (20) years or less expiring before age seventy-one (71), for which uniform premiums are payable during the entire term of the policy;

Term policy of decreasing amount which provides no guaranteed nonforfeiture or endowment benefits and on which each adjusted premium, calculated as specified in W.S.

26-16-205

through

26-16-209

, is less than the adjusted premium so calculated, on a term policy of uniform amount, or renewal thereof, which provides no guaranteed nonforfeiture or endowment benefits, issued at the same age, for the same initial amount of insurance, and for a term of twenty (20) years or less expiring before age seventy-one (71), for which uniform premiums are payable during the entire term of the policy;

Policy which provides no guaranteed nonforfeiture or endowment benefits and for which no cash surrender value or present value of paid-up nonforfeiture benefit at the beginning of the policy year and calculated as specified in W.S. 26-16-203(b) through

26-16-209

, exceed two and one-half percent (21/2%) of the amount of insurance at the beginning of the policy year. For purposes of paragraph (vi) of this subsection and this paragraph, the age at expiration of a joint term life insurance policy is the age at expiration of the oldest life; or

Policy which is delivered outside this state through an agent or other representative of the insurer issuing the policy.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 364; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-364; Laws 1975, ch. 99, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-127; Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 2; 1983, ch. 31, § 1; ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.